New Jersey, session 221, A575.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Within 1[90] 1801 days after the date of enactment of this section, the Department of Environmental Protection shall develop, and update as appropriate, guidelines on recommended recovered material content percentages for use by State and local agencies when entering into contracts for the purchase of goods, in order to encourage the purchase of goods made with recycled material 1, including compost1 . These guidelines may be based upon, or may incorporate by reference, guidelines developed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, including, but not limited to, the recommended recovered materials content levels specified in the United States Environmental Protection Agencys Consolidated Recovered Materials Advisory Notice. b.  The Department of Environmental Protection shall publish the guidelines developed pursuant to subsection a. of this section, and any updates thereto, 1[as a public notice in the New Jersey Register] on the departments Internet website1. c.  The Director of the Division of Purchase and Property in the Department of the Treasury, the Director of the Division of Property Management and Construction in the Department of the Treasury, and all State and local agencies having authority to contract for the purchase of goods 1[or services]1 shall ensure that all product specifications for new procurements advertised after the 1[effective date of P.L.    , c.   (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill)] publication of the guidelines pursuant to subsection b. of this section1 reflect the guidelines developed, or updated, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, if applicable, and to the extent practical and feasible. 1d.1  Nothing in this subsection shall apply to product specifications for: 1(1) any binding contractual obligations for the purchase of goods entered into prior to the publication of the guidelines pursuant to subsection b. of this section; (2) bid packages advertised and made available to the public, or to any competitive and sealed bids received by the State, prior to the publication of the guidelines pursuant to subsection b. of this section; (3) any amendment, modification, or renewal of a contract, which contract was entered into prior to the publication of the guidelines pursuant to subsection b. of this section, where following the guidelines developed, or updated, pursuant to subsection a. of this section would delay timely completion of a project or increase the cost of the contract by an unreasonable amount; or (4)1 a contract entered into by a local contracting unit, if following the guidelines developed, or updated, pursuant to subsection a. of this section would increase the cost of the contract. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.